Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1486.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5762. Bail in illegal firearm offenses in city of the first class.A defendant who has been charged with possession of an illegal firearm or for committing an offense with an illegal firearm under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to firearms and other dangerous articles) in a city of the first class and has been granted bail may obtain the defendant's release from custody by posting bail as follows:(1) For a first offense, a sum equal to 10% of the full amount of the bail.123456789101112131415161718 (2) For a second offense, a sum equal to 50% of the full amount of the bail.(3) For a third or subsequent offense, a sum equal to 100% of the full amount of the bail.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1486PN1740 - 2 - 12345